District of Columbia statutes.
38-824.03

Additional requirements.

(a)

A student with disabilities shall have suitably adapted physical education incorporated as part of the individualized education program developed for the student. With a written note from a physician, public schools and public charter schools may provide suitably adapted physical education for any other student with special needs that preclude the student from participating in regular physical education instruction.

(b)

Requiring or withholding physical activity shall not be used to punish students; provided, that students who are not wearing appropriate athletic clothing may be prohibited from participating in physical activity until properly dressed.

July 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-209, § 403, 57 DCR 4779